District of Columbia statutes.
2-218.43

Bid and proposal preferences.

(a)

In evaluating bids or proposals, agencies shall award preferences as follows:

(1)

In the case of proposals, points shall be granted as follows:

(A)

Three points for a small business enterprise;

(B)

Five points for a resident-owned business;

(C)

Five points for a longtime resident business;

(D)

Two points for a local business enterprise;

(E)

Two points for a local business enterprise with its principal office located in an enterprise zone;

(F)

Two points for a disadvantaged business enterprise;

(G)

Two points for a veteran-owned business enterprise; and

(H)

Two points for a local manufacturing business enterprise.

(2)

In the case of bids, a percentage reduction in price shall be granted as follows:

(A)

Three percent for a small business enterprise;

(B)

Five percent for a resident-owned business;

(C)

Ten percent for a longtime resident business;

(D)

Two percent for a local business enterprise;

(E)

Two percent for a local business enterprise with its principal office located in an enterprise zone;

(F)

Two percent for a disadvantaged business enterprise;

(G)

Two percent for a veteran-owned business enterprise; and

(H)

Two percent for a local manufacturing business enterprise.

(b)

A certified business enterprise shall be entitled to any or all of the preferences provided in this section, but in no case shall a certified business enterprise be entitled to a preference of more than 12 points or a reduction in price of more than 12 percent.

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2343, 52 DCR 7503
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-266, § 2(b), 54 DCR 829
July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-207, § 2(h), 55 DCR 6107
Apr. 20, 2010, D.C. Law 18-141, § 2(h), 57 DCR 1485
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 13(b), 59 DCR 6190
June 10, 2014, D.C. Law 20-108, § 2(t), 61 DCR 3892
This section is referenced in § 2-218.46 and § 2-218.62.
D.C. Law 16-266, in subsec. (a)(1)(B), substituted “Five points” for “Three points”; and, in (a)(2)(B), substituted “Five percent” for “Three percent”.
D.C. Law 17-207, in pars. (1)(B) and (2)(B), inserted “a” preceding “resident-owned”.
D.C. Law 18-141, in subsec. (a)(1), substituted “Five points” for “Ten points” in subpar. (C), deleted “and” from the end of subpar. (E); substituted “; and” for a period at the end of subpar. (F), and added subpars. (G) and (H).
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 repealed D.C. Law 18-141, § 2(h)(3), which had amended (a)(1)(F) by striking the period and inserting the phrase “; and” in its place.
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-108 added (a)(2)(G) and (a)(2)(H) and made related changes.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(h) of the Department of Small and Local Business Development Subcontracting Clarification, Benefit Expansion, and Grant-making Authority Temporary Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Law 17-96, January 29, 2008, law notification 55 DCR 3403).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2343 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(h) of Department of Small and Local Business Development Subcontracting Clarification, Benefit Expansion, and Grant-making Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-156, October 18, 2007, 54 DCR 10919).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(h) of Department of Small and Local Business Development Subcontracting Clarification, Benefit Expansion, and Grant-making Authority Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-251, January 23, 2008, 55 DCR 1259).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).

Law 20-108: Section 4(a) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that applications pending as of June 10, 2014, shall not be subject to the provisions of the act.

Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that, except as provided in § 2-218.46(f), contracts existing or pending as of June 10, 2014, shall not be affected by the provisions of the act.

Section 4(c) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 4(c) of D.C. Law 20-108 was repealed by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7005.